Connecticut, session 2026, HB05548.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 1-217 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No public agency may disclose, under the Freedom of Information
Act, from its personnel, medical or similar files, the residential address
of any of the following persons: [employed by such public agency:]
(1) A federal court judge, federal court magistrate, judge of the
Superior Court, Appellate Court or Supreme Court of the state, or
family support magistrate;
(2) A sworn member of a municipal police department, a sworn
member of the Division of State Police within the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection or a sworn law enforcement
officer within the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection;
(3) An employee of the Department of Correction;
HB5548 / File No. 553 1

HB5548 File No. 553
(4) An attorney-at-law who represents or has represented the state in
a criminal prosecution;
(5) An attorney-at-law who is or has been employed by the Division
of Public Defender Services or a social worker who is employed by the
Division of Public Defender Services;
(6) An inspector employed by the Division of Criminal Justice;
(7) A firefighter;
(8) An employee of the Department of Children and Families;
(9) A member or employee of the Board of Pardons and Paroles;
(10) An employee of the judicial branch;
(11) An employee of the Department of Mental Health and Addiction
Services who provides direct care to patients;
(12) A member or employee of the Commission on Human Rights
and Opportunities; [or]
(13) A state marshal appointed by the State Marshal Commission
pursuant to section 6-38b; or
(14) Any other employee of a public agency, except when residency
is a condition or term of such person's employment.
(b) The business address of any person described in this section, and
the address of each town hall, city hall or other municipal building in
which the office of the registrars of voters of a municipality is located,
shall be subject to disclosure under section 1-210, as amended by this
act. The provisions of this section shall not apply to Department of
Motor Vehicles records described in section 14-10.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a), (b) and (e) of this section,
no public agency may disclose the residential address of any person
listed in subsection (a) of this section from any record described in
HB5548 / File No. 553 2

HB5548 File No. 553
subdivision (2) of this subsection that is requested in accordance with
the provisions of said subdivision, regardless of whether such person is
an employee of the public agency, provided such person has (A)
submitted a written request for the nondisclosure of the person's
residential address to the public agency, and (B) furnished his or her
business address to the public agency.
(2) Any public agency that receives a request for a record subject to
disclosure under this chapter where such request (A) specifically names
a person who has requested that his or her address be kept confidential
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall make a copy of the record
requested to be disclosed and shall redact the copy to remove such
person's residential address prior to disclosing such record, (B) is for an
existing list that is derived from a readily accessible electronic database,
shall make a reasonable effort to redact the residential address of any
person who has requested that his or her address be kept confidential
under subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to the release of such list,
or (C) is for any list that the public agency voluntarily creates in
response to a request for disclosure, shall make a reasonable effort to
redact the residential address of any person who has requested that his
or her address be kept confidential under subdivision (1) of this
subsection prior to the release of such list.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, an agency shall
not be prohibited from disclosing the residential address of any person
listed in subsection (a) of this section from any record other than the
records described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of subdivision
(2) of this subsection.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a), (b) and (e) of this section
and subject to the provisions of subdivisions (2) and (3) of this
subsection, no public agency of a municipality may disclose, under the
Freedom of Information Act, from a public record, including any record
described in subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, the
residential address of any person who is a municipal clerk, registrar of
voters, deputy registrar of voters, election official described in section 9-
HB5548 / File No. 553 3

HB5548 File No. 553
258, primary official described in section 9-436 or audit official described
in section 9-320f, regardless of whether such person is an employee of
the public agency, provided such person has (A) submitted to the
municipality a written request for the nondisclosure of the person's
residential address, and (B) furnished to the municipality (i) his or her
business address, or (ii) if such person does not have a business address,
the address of the town hall, city hall or other municipal building in
which the office of the registrars of voters of such municipality is
located.
(2) (A) If a person submits a written request described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection prior to the ninetieth day preceding an election, the
prohibition in said subdivision against disclosing such person's
residential address shall take effect on the ninetieth day preceding such
election and shall expire on the ninetieth day following such election.
(B) If a person submits a written request described in subdivision (1)
of this subsection on or after the ninetieth day preceding an election, the
prohibition in said subdivision against disclosing such person's
residential address shall take effect upon such submission and shall
expire on the ninetieth day following such election.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit
the disclosure of the residential address of any person described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection in the case where such residential
address appears on a public record by virtue of such person holding any
elective or appointive state or municipal office other than municipal
clerk, registrar of voters or deputy registrar of voters.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit
100 the disclosure without redaction of any document, as defined in section
101 7-35bb, any list prepared under title 9, or any list published under
102 section 12-55.
103 (f) No public agency or public official or employee of a public agency
104 shall be penalized for violating a provision of this section, unless such
105 violation is wilful and knowing. Any complaint of such a violation shall
HB5548 / File No. 553 4

HB5548 File No. 553
106 be made to the Freedom of Information Commission. Upon receipt of
107 such a complaint, the commission shall serve upon the public agency,
108 official or employee, as the case may be, by certified or registered mail,
109 a copy of the complaint. The commission shall provide the public
110 agency, official or employee with an opportunity to be heard at a
111 hearing conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
112 unless the commission, upon motion of the public agency, official or
113 employee or upon motion of the commission, dismisses the complaint
114 without a hearing if it finds, after examining the complaint and
115 construing all allegations most favorably to the complainant, that the
116 public agency, official or employee has not wilfully and knowingly
117 violated a provision of this section. If the commission finds that the
118 public agency, official or employee wilfully and knowingly violated a
119 provision of this section, the commission may impose against such
120 public agency, official or employee a civil penalty of not less than twenty
121 dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. Nothing in this section shall
122 be construed to allow a private right of action against a public agency,
123 public official or employee of a public agency.
124 Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 1-210 of the 2026 supplement to the
125 general statutes is amended by adding subdivision (29) as follows
126 (Effective October 1, 2026):
127 (NEW) (29) Records maintained or kept on file by or for the faculty
128 or staff of a public institution of higher education arising out of teaching
129 or research on medical, artistic, scientific, legal or other scholarly issues,
130 including any such records of legal clinics or centers, but excluding any
131 financial records of such institution.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-217
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 1-210(b)(29)
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5548 / File No. 553 5

HB5548 File No. 553
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands existing prohibitions against disclosure of
residential addresses, personnel, and medical files and exempts certain
proprietary records held by public institutions of higher education from
disclosure, resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5548 / File No. 553 6

HB5548 File No. 553
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5548
AN ACT CONCERNING REVISIONS TO THE FREEDOM OF
INFORMATION ACT CONCERNING EMPLOYEE RESIDENTIAL
ADDRESSES AND CERTAIN HIGHER EDUCATION RECORDS.